Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Forestry Inventory and Strategic Planning Law

§ 49-19-401.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§49-19-401. [Laws, 2002, ch. 571, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.]

§ 49-19-403.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§49-19-403. [Laws, 2002, ch. 571, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 571, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.]

§ 49-19-405.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§49-19-405. [Laws, 2002, ch. 571, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.]

§ 49-19-407.
Coordinated Outreach and Education Programs.

The Executive Directors of the Mississippi Forestry Commission, the Mississippi Development Authority, the MSU Forest and Wildlife Research Center, and the Cooperative Extension Service shall establish a procedure and guidelines for the coordination of outreach and education programs. It shall be the duty of each agency to cooperate and to promote a coordinated outreach and education program to increase the utilization of private nonindustrial forest landowner forest resources and increase profitability for such resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 571 , § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2002; Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 49-19-408.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§49-19-408. [Laws, 2005, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2005).]

§ 49-19-409.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2005, ch. 398, § 1, effective from and after passage March 16, 2005.

[Laws, 2002, ch. 571, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2002.]